District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0630.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act
may be cited as the “Rate Plan Vacatur Interim Protections Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. The Retail Electric Competition and Consumer Protection Act of 1999, effective May
9, 2000 (D.C. Law 13-107; D.C. Official Code § 34-1501 et seq.), is amended by adding a new
section 106b to read as follows:
“Sec. 106b. Disconnection of service during remand interim period prohibited.
“(a) For the purposes of this section, the term “remand interim period” means the period of
time after the issuance of a judicial order vacating a multi-year rate plan approved by the Commission
and before a new rate plan is approved and instituted.
“(b) An electric company may not disconnect electric service for non-payment of a bill or fees
during the remand interim period or for 15 calendar days after the end of the remand interim period,
unless the household has an average outstanding balance of more than $1,000:
“(1) For any single-family residence, or any unit within a multifamily residence
at which each unit’s electricity usage can be measured; or
“(2) Per unit for any multifamily residence at which each unit’s electricity
usage cannot be measured, to be calculated by dividing the amount of the total arrearage assigned to
the property by the number of units at the property at the time of the proposed disconnection,
regardless of the amount of debt held by the owner or an individual tenant.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
1

Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and shall remain in effect for no longer than 90
days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section 412(a) of
the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788; D.C. Official
Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2